District of Columbia statutes.
31-1603

Prohibited actions.

(a)

Repealed.

(b)

(1)

In determining whether to issue, cancel, or renew insurance coverage, an insurer may not use age, marital status, geographic area of residence, occupation, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, or any similar factor or combination of factors for the purpose of seeking to predict whether any individual may in the future develop AIDS or ARC.

(2)

In determining rates, premiums, dues, assessments, benefits covered, or expenses reimbursable, or in any other aspect of insurance marketing or coverage, an insurer may not use age, marital status, geographic area of residence, occupation, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, or any similar factor or combination of factors for the purpose of seeking to predict whether any individual may in the future develop AIDS or ARC.

(c)

No health or disability insurance policy or contract shall contain any exclusion, reduction, other limitation of coverage, deductibles, or coinsurance provisions related to the care and treatment of AIDS, ARC, HIV infection, or any illness or disease arising from these medical conditions, unless the provisions apply generally to all benefits under the policy or contract.

(d)

No life insurance policy or contract shall contain any exclusion, reduction, or other limitation of benefits related to AIDS, ARC, HIV infection, or any disease arising from these medical conditions, as a cause of death.

Aug. 7, 1986, D.C. Law 6-132, § 4, 33 DCR 3615
Mar. 16, 1989, D.C. Law 7-208, § 2(b), 36 DCR 471
June 25, 2008, D.C. Law 17-177, § 15(b), 55 DCR 3696
1981 Ed., § 35-223.
D.C. Law 17-177, in subsec. (b), substituted “sexual orientation, gender identity or expression” for “sexual orientation”.